Maine, session 132, LD823.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §15312 is enacted to read:
§15312. Competitive grants for statewide experiential science, technology,
engineering and mathematics competition programs
1. Grant purposes. The institute may award a grant through a competitive process to
an organization based in this State that demonstrates that the organization is going to use
the funds for a statewide experiential competition program for high school students in
science, technology, engineering and mathematics and that:
A. Maintains a formal affiliation with a national science, technology, engineering and
mathematics program to provide opportunities for students to present Maine-based
research to a national audience and facilitates participation in the national program by
students who meet qualification standards at no cost to the students or the schools they
attend;
B. Demonstrates a plan to broaden participation in student-led experiential science and
engineering research projects by creating professional development opportunities for
educators and learning opportunities for students who have not historically participated
in student-led experiential science and engineering research projects, in accordance
with the criteria described in subsection 3;
C. Demonstrates a plan to maintain a formal partnership with the University of Maine
System to provide high school students increased access to college-level courses and
consideration for scholarship opportunities;
D. Demonstrates a plan to evaluate the effects of sustaining and increasing engagement
with science, technology, engineering and mathematics at participating high schools;
and
E. Demonstrates a plan to make student-led experiential science and engineering
research projects accessible to an increasingly diverse student population, including
individuals typically underrepresented in science, technology, engineering and
mathematics professions, in accordance with the criteria described in subsection 3.
2. Grant requirements. An organization that receives a grant under this section shall:
A. Provide matching funds in the amount of the grant to be used for the same purpose
for which the grant was awarded; and
B. Deliver to the institute a report on the use of the grant money, including measurable
outcomes.
3. Broadening participation. An organization that receives a grant under this section
shall use the following criteria to make the program available to a diverse population of
students and schools, as required under subsection 1, paragraphs B and E. The organization
shall make the program available to students from:
A. Each of the State's 16 counties;
B. Public schools and private schools and to students who are homeschooled;
Page 1 - 132LR1934(01)

C. Schools that are eligible for schoolwide Title I benefits, as defined and identified by
the United States Department of Education, National Center for Education Statistics;
and
D. Schools in cities, suburban areas, towns and rural locales, as defined and identified
by the United States Department of Education, National Center for Education
Statistics.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
Office of Innovation 0995
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to the Maine Technology Institute to award grants to an
organization for certain activities related to statewide science, technology, engineering and
mathematics competition programs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $75,000 $75,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $75,000 $75,000